texmf/tex/hyph-utf8/hyph-fi-x-school.tex
% title: Hyphenation patterns for Finnish according to the method taught in schools
% copyright: Copyright (C) 2020 Teemu Likonen, Arthur Rosendahl
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
% language:
%     name: Finnish, school hyphenation
%     tag: fi-x-school
% version: 1.0 2021-03-21
% hyphenmins:
%     generation:
%         left: 1
%         right: 1
% authors:
%     -
%         name: Teemu Likonen
%     -
%         name: Arthur Rosendahl
%         contact: arthur (at) hyphenation (dot) org
% licence:
%     -
%         name: MIT
%         url: https://opensource.org/licenses/MIT
% changes:
%     - April 2020 Initial development work
%     - 21 March 2021 First public release
% texlive:
%     encoding: ec
%     message: Finnish hyphenation patterns for school
%     package: finnish
%     babelname: schoolfinnish
% ==========================================
%
.b2l2
.b2r2
.c2h
.c2l2
.c2r2
.d2l2
.d2na
.d2r2
.d2ž
.f2l2
.f2r2
.g2h
.g2l2
.g2n
.g2r2
.k2h2
.k2l2
.k2n
.k2r2
.k2s
.k2v
.l2vi
.p2h
.p2l2
.p2n
.p2r2
.p2s
.p2t2
.q2l2
.q2r2
.r2h
.s2c2
.s2f
.s2h
.s2k2
.s2l
.s2m
.s2n
.s2p2
.s2q
.s2t2
.s2v
.s2w
.t2h2
.t2l2
.t2r2
.t2s
.t2v
.t2w
.t2š
.w2h
.x2l2
.x2r2
.z2l
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1by
1bä
1bö
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1cy
1cä
1cö
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1dä
1dö
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1fä
1fö
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1gä
1gö
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1hä
1hö
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1jy
1jä
1jö
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1kä
1kö
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1lä
1lö
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1mä
1mö
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1nä
1nö
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1pä
1pö
1qa
1qe
1qi
1qo
1qu
1qy
1qä
1qö
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1rä
1rö
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1sä
1sö
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1tä
1tö
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1vä
1vö
1wa
1we
1wi
1wo
1wu
1wy
1wä
1wö
1xa
1xe
1xi
1xo
1xu
1xy
1xä
1xö
1za
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
1zä
1zö
1ša
1še
1ši
1šo
1šu
1šy
1šä
1šö
1ža
1že
1ži
1žo
1žu
1žy
1žä
1žö
a1e
a1ii
a1o
a1uu
a1y
a1ä
a1ö
aa1i
aa1u
ai1e
ai1u
ai1y
au1o
e1a
e1ii
e1o
e1uu
e1yy
e1ä
e1ö
ee1i
ee1u
ee1y
i1a
i1ee
i1o
i1uu
i1yy
i1ä
i1ö
ie1y
ii1e
ii1u
ii1y
iu1o
o1a
o1e
o1ii
o1uu
o1y
o1ä
o1ö
oi1e
oi1u
oo1i
oo1u
ou1o
u1a
u1e
u1ii
u1oo
u1y
u1ä
u1ö
uo1u
uu1i
uu1o
y1a
y1e
y1ii
y1o
y1u
y1ä
y1öö
yy1i
yy1ö
ä1a
ä1e
ä1ii
ä1o
ä1u
ä1yy
ä1ö
äi1e
ää1i
ää1y
ö1a
ö1e
ö1ii
ö1o
ö1u
ö1yy
ö1ä
öö1i
öö1y
